test/src/morphology/V-istma86_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `istma2: # Verb (86) `istma2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `istma+V+Inf/mA: `istma
     `istma+V+Inf: `istuq
     `istma+V+ActPrtPrc: `istnuq
     `istma+V+PssPrtPrc: istut
     `istma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: istu
     `istma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ist
     `istma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [istõ, `istsõ]
     `istma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [`istõ, `istsõ]
